California statutes. Water Code
While any bonds remain outstanding, the powers, duties or existence of the department or any official or agency of the State shall not be diminished or impaired in any manner that will affect adversely the interests and rights of the holders of the bonds.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

11708.

The holder of any bond may by mandamus or other appropriate proceedings require and compel the performance of any of the duties imposed upon any state department, official, or employee in connection with any of the following:

(a) The construction of the project.

(b) The collection, deposit, application, and disbursement of all revenues derived from the operation and use of the project.

(c) The deposit and disbursement of the proceeds received from the sale of bonds.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

11709.

The enumeration of rights and remedies in the next preceding section does not exclude the exercise or prosecution of any other rights or remedies by holders of bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 370.)
-------------------------------------------

11710.

The department may contract loans and borrow money from the United States through the sale of bonds upon such conditions and terms as may be agreed to and such bonds shall be subject to all the provisions of this part except the requirement that bonds be first offered at public sale pursuant to advertisement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

11711.

Temporary or interim bonds, certificates, or receipts, of any denominations and with or without coupons attached thereto, signed by the director, may be issued and delivered until the definitive bonds are executed and available for delivery.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

11712.

The purchase price of bonds shall be paid for the account of the department to the Treasurer or the designee of the Treasurer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 5, Sec. 3.   Effective June 6, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

11713.

Notwithstanding anything otherwise provided in this part, any expense incurred by the department for advertising, engraving, printing, clerical, legal, or other services necessary to properly perform the services and duties relating to the sale and issuance of bonds shall be paid from the proceeds of the sale of bonds.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

11714.

The department shall return the appropriation made by Chapter 12 of the Statutes of 1935, or so much thereof as is used, with interest thereon at the rate of 4 percent per annum to the General Fund in the State Treasury from the proceeds of the first sale of revenue bonds issued for the construction of the project under the provisions of this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Payment from Revenue [11720. - 11723.]

11720.

Bonds issued under this part shall contain a recital on the face thereof that the payment or redemption of the bonds and the payment of interest thereon is secured by a first and direct charge and lien upon the revenues of any nature whatever received from the operation of the Central Valley Project for the construction of which the bonds are issued and that neither the payment of the principal or any part thereof or any interest thereon constitutes a debt, liability, or obligation of the State of California.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 370.)
-------------------------------------------

11721.

Bonds issued under this part shall not constitute or be a debt, liability, or obligation of the State. Payment of both principal and interest of all such bonds shall be secured only by the rates, charges, and revenues established or accruing from the use or operation of the project and shall be made from such revenues or from such contributions or appropriations as may be made available under the terms of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 370.)
-------------------------------------------

11722.

All bond redemption and interest payments shall constitute a first and direct charge and lien on all revenues received from the operation of the project, on all interest accruing from such revenues, and on all sinking funds created out of such revenues.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 370.)
-------------------------------------------

11723.

The collection of revenues shall be continued until all bonds with interest thereon are fully redeemed and paid.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 370.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Bond Form and Terms [11730. - 11740.]

11730.

The department shall determine the form, conditions, and denominations of all bonds and the dates which the bonds shall bear.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

11731.

The department and the Treasurer shall determine the interest rate or rates on the bonds. The rate or rates may be fixed or variable and shall not exceed 12 percent per annum, except that the rate on any bond may, on any day, exceed 12 percent per annum if the interest borne by the issue of which the bond is a part from its date of issuance to, and including, that day does not exceed the total interest which would have been borne by the issue if all bonds of the issue had borne interest during that period at the rate of 12 percent per annum.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 719, Sec. 2.   Effective September 15, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

11732.

It is not necessary that all bonds of the same authorized issue bear the same interest rate.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 370.)
-------------------------------------------

11733.

Principal and interest on bonds shall be payable at such place or places as may be fixed and determined by the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

11734.

Bonds may contain provisions for registration thereof as to principal only or as to both principal and interest.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 370.)
-------------------------------------------

11735.

Bonds may be issued in coupon form with interest payable at such times as determined by the department and shall mature at such times and in such amounts as the department prescribes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 404, Sec. 1.   Effective July 27, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

11736.

The department may provide for the retirement of bonds at any time or times prior to their maturity and in such manner and upon payment of such premiums as may be fixed and determined in the proceedings providing for the issuance of the bonds and referred to therein.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

11736.5.

The department may enter into banking, insurance, remarketing, and other financial arrangements as may be necessary or desirable to provide additional security for the payment of principal and interest on the bonds or to provide the holders of the bonds the right to tender bonds to the department or to another party for purchase at the times, on the notice, and on those other terms as the department may determine. These arrangements may provide for the reimbursement by the department, with interest, of moneys advanced by the provider of additional security, the provider of a tender right, the provider of moneys to fund a tender right, or anyone performing a related function, except that the interest rate on the reimbursement obligation shall not exceed the rate specified in Section 11731 and the sources of moneys for the reimbursement shall be only the sources available for the payment of the bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 719, Sec. 3.   Effective September 15, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

11737.

All bonds shall be signed by the director and countersigned by the Governor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

11738.

The signature of the director and the Governor may be by facsimile.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1968, Ch. 411.)
-------------------------------------------

11739.

All interest coupons shall bear the facsimile signature of the director.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

11740.

In case any officer whose signature or countersignature appears on the bonds or coupons ceases to be such officer before the delivery of the bonds to the purchaser, his signature or countersignature shall nevertheless be valid and sufficient for all purposes the same as if he had remained in the office until the delivery of the bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 370.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Issuance and Sale [11750. - 11755.]

11750.

Bonds may be issued and sold from time to time and in such amounts as may be deemed necessary in the judgment of the department to provide sufficient funds for the purposes authorized by this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 5, Sec. 4.   Effective June 6, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

11751.

Bonds may be sold below the par or face value thereof, but the sale price shall not be less than 94 percent of the par or face value of the bonds, and the sale price shall include the interest which has accrued thereon up to the date of delivery of the bonds.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 828.)
-------------------------------------------

11752.

Successive issues of bonds shall have equal preference with respect to the redemption thereof and the payment of interest thereon, but the department may fix different maturity dates serially or otherwise for successive issues.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

11753.

All bonds issued are negotiable instruments.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 370.)
-------------------------------------------

11754.

All bonds authorized for issuance by the department shall be sold by the Treasurer at public sale by bid or at private sale by negotiation, as directed by the department after consultation with the Treasurer. If the bonds are to be sold by a negotiated sale, the Treasurer shall select the underwriter or underwriters after consultation with the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 719, Sec. 4.   Effective September 15, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

11755.

The department may borrow money in anticipation of the sale of bonds duly authorized to be issued, but which have not yet been sold and delivered, and for that purpose may issue negotiable bond anticipation bonds and may renew such bond anticipation bonds from time to time, but the maximum maturity of any such bond anticipation bonds, including the renewals thereof, shall not exceed five years from the date of the original bond anticipation bonds. Such bond anticipation bonds may be issued at public or private sale. The department may provide, by resolution, for issuance at such maturities, interest rates, in such form, and under such other terms and conditions as the department, in its discretion, may determine.

The proceeds from the sale of such bond anticipation bonds shall be used only for the purposes for which may be used the proceeds of the sale of bonds in anticipation whereof they were issued. Such bond anticipation bonds shall not be issued in an amount in excess of the aggregate amount of bonds authorized to be issued, less the amount of any of such authorized bonds previously sold, and also less the amount of other bond anticipation bonds issued in anticipation thereof and then outstanding.

The principal of such bond anticipation bonds may be paid from any moneys available therefor and not otherwise pledged. If such bond anticipation bonds, or any portion thereof, have not been previously paid, they shall be paid from the proceeds of the next sale of bonds in anticipation whereof they were issued.

Interest on such bond anticipation bonds shall be payable from the same funds from which the interest on the bonds in anticipation whereof they were issued is payable. Interest on the bond anticipation bonds may be paid out of proceeds thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 828.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Disposition of Proceeds from Bond Sale [11760. - 11762.]

11760.

The proceeds from the sale of bonds shall be paid to the Treasurer or the designee of the Treasurer to the credit of the construction fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 5, Sec. 5.   Effective June 6, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

11761.

The proceeds shall be paid out, disbursed, or applied solely for one or more of the following:

(a) The construction, reconstruction, and repair of the project.

(b) Surveys and the preparation of plans and specifications.

(c) Payment of all other costs and expenses prior to and during construction. 

(d) The acquisition of the necessary water, water rights, rights-of-way, easements, lands, electric power, power resources and facilities, other property of every kind and description, and any appurtenances to that property necessary therefor, including facilities planned and designed in cooperation with, and among, water agencies, water districts, and irrigation districts.

(e) The payment of interest becoming due and payable on bonds prior to and during the period of actual construction and for the period of one year after the completion of construction.

(f) All costs and expenses during a period of one year after completion of construction only as the need therefor shall arise.

(g) The establishment of a debt service reserve fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 427, Sec. 170.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

11761.5.

(a) If the department sells bonds to finance a water purchase, the bonds, including all refinancing of the bonds, shall be scheduled to mature within five years of the date of the initial sale of the bonds. 

(b) (1) Subdivision (a) does not apply to bonds sold to finance a water purchase arrangement which is planned to extend beyond five years, if the bonds, including all refinancing of the bonds, are scheduled to mature not later than the date on which the water purchase arrangement will terminate. 

(2) “Water purchase arrangement,” for purposes of this subdivision, means a purchase, exchange, or standby agreement entered into by the department with one or more persons or entities to receive water from, or as a result of actions by, those persons or entities for the duration of the agreement. 

(c) Subdivision (a) does not apply to bonds sold to finance a water purchase for the purpose of long-term carryover storage.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 5, Sec. 7.   Effective June 6, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

11762.

The department may agree with the purchaser of bonds upon any conditions or limitations restricting the disbursement of the proceeds that may be deemed advisable for the purpose of assuring the proper application of the proceeds.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Payment of Principal and Interest [11770. - 11772.]

11770.

From the money deposited in the construction fund the State Treasurer shall transfer to the place or places of payment named in the bonds the sums required to pay the interest as it becomes due on all bonds sold and outstanding for the construction of the project during the period of actual construction and during a period of one year after completion thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 370.)
-------------------------------------------

11771.

After the periods mentioned in the next preceding section the Treasurer shall transfer from the revenue fund to the place or places named in the bonds the sums required to pay the interest on the bonds and redeem the principal thereof as such interest payments and bond redemptions fall due for all bonds issued and sold.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 370.)
-------------------------------------------

11772.

All funds transferred for the payment of principal or interest on bonds shall be segregated and applied solely for the payment of the principal and interest.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 370.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Retirement of Bonds [11780. - 11784.]

11780.

Any surplus which exists in the construction fund shall be applied to the retirement of bonds issued for construction of the project by purchase or call.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 370.)
-------------------------------------------

11781.

In the event the bonds cannot be purchased at a price satisfactory to the department and are not by their terms callable prior to maturity such surplus shall be paid into the fund applicable to the payment of principal and interest of the bonds and shall be used for that purpose.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

11782.

The proceedings authorizing the issuance of bonds may provide limitations and conditions upon the time and manner of applying such surplus to the purchase and call of outstanding bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 370.)
-------------------------------------------

11783.

The terms upon which the bonds shall be purchased or called and such limitations and conditions as are mentioned in the preceding section shall be followed and observed in the application and use of such surplus.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 370.)
-------------------------------------------

11784.

All bonds retired by purchase or call shall be immediately canceled.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 370.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 9. Finances [11800. - 11855.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Financial Provisions [11800. - 11807.]

11800.

Money required to meet the costs of construction of the project and all expenses and costs incidental thereto and to meet the costs of operating and maintaining and making necessary replacements thereto shall be paid by the State Treasurer from the proper fund upon demand of the department. Payments shall be made after audit in the manner provided by law and upon warrants drawn by the State Controller.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

11801.

All interest received or earned on money deposited in a fund provided for in this part shall be credited to and become a part of the particular fund upon which the interest accrues.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 370.)
-------------------------------------------

11802.

The proceedings authorizing the issuance of bonds may contain appropriate provisions governing the use and application of bond proceeds and revenues for the purposes specified in this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 370.)
-------------------------------------------

11803.

The department may provide in the proceedings authorizing the issuance of bonds or may otherwise agree with the purchasers of bonds regarding the deposit of all money constituting the construction fund, and the revenue fund and may also provide for the deposit of such money at such times and with such depositaries or paying agents and upon the furnishing of such security as may meet with the approval of the purchasers of the bonds.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

11804.

The depositaries and security provided for or agreed upon shall be qualified and eligible in accordance with the requirements of law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 370.)
-------------------------------------------

11805.

Notwithstanding anything contained in this part, the proceeds received from the sale of bonds and the revenues received from the operation of the project may be used to defray any expenses incurred by the department in connection with and incidental to the issuance and sale of bonds for the construction of the project, including expenses for the preparation of surveys, plans, and estimates and the making of inspections and examinations required by the purchasers of bonds.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

11806.

The amounts required to be transferred by the State Treasurer as provided in this part shall be ascertained and computed by the department and the certificate of the department is conclusive and binding upon the State Treasurer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

11807.

When the department, with the concurrence of the Department of Finance, deems it in the best interests of the state, it may authorize the State Treasurer, upon such terms and conditions as may be fixed by the department, to issue notes, in the manner prescribed by this section, maturing within a period not to exceed five years, payable from revenues received from the operation of the project or from federal reimbursements received under the National Disaster Act, or both. Notes authorized to be issued shall be issued at public sale on a competitive-bid basis upon such notice as the State Treasurer may deem advisable, except that if no bids are received or if such bids are not satisfactory to the State Treasurer, such notes may be issued on a negotiated-bid basis. The proceeds from the sale of such notes shall be used only for the purpose of providing funds for emergency repairs to the project necessitated by natural disasters.

All notes issued and any renewals thereof shall be payable at a fixed time, solely from revenues received from the operation of the project or from federal reimbursements received under the National Disaster Act, or both, and not otherwise, except that in the event that sufficient revenues or reimbursements, or both, are not received prior to the maturity of the notes, the State Treasurer shall, in order to meet the notes then maturing, issue renewal notes for such purpose.

Every note and any renewal thereof shall be payable from revenues received from the operation of the project or from federal reimbursements received under the National Disaster Act, or both, and not otherwise. The total amount of such notes or renewals thereof issued and outstanding shall at no time exceed anticipated revenues from the operation of the project or federal reimbursements under the National Disaster Act, or both, to be received during the following two years.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1068.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Construction Fund [11810. - 11814.]

11810.

There is in the State Treasury The Central Valley Water Project Construction Fund which is continued in existence.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 370.)
-------------------------------------------

11811.

The construction fund shall at all times be kept segregated and set apart from all other funds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 370.)
-------------------------------------------

11812.

Any and all appropriations and contributions received from the United States, the State, any State agency, any political subdivision, or any other source for the purpose of constructing the project, or borrowed therefrom for such purpose, shall be received by the State Treasurer and deposited in and credited to the construction fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 370.)
-------------------------------------------

11813.

All costs and expenses of the department, including interest due and payable, incurred in performing the duties prescribed in this part prior to and during the construction of the project and for a period of one year after completion thereof, shall be paid out of the construction fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

11814.

All the costs and expenses mentioned in the next preceding section shall be charged as a part of the cost of construction of the project and the money in the construction fund is hereby appropriated for such purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 370.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Revenue Fund [11815. - 11823.]

11815.

There is in the State Treasury the Central Valley Water Project Revenue Fund which is continued in existence.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 370.)
-------------------------------------------

11816.

All revenues received from the operation of the project shall be paid over by the department at least monthly to the State Treasurer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

11817.

The State Treasurer shall deposit the revenues to the credit of the revenue fund as demand deposits in a depositary authorized by law to receive deposits of State funds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 370.)
-------------------------------------------

11818.

The revenue fund shall at all times be kept segregated and set apart from all other funds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 370.)
-------------------------------------------

11819.

All appropriations and contributions received from the United States, the State, any State agency, any political subdivision, or from any other source for the purpose of maintaining or operating the project, or borrowed therefrom for such purposes, shall be received by the State Treasurer and deposited in and credited to the revenue fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 370.)
-------------------------------------------

11820.

After the expiration of one year after the completion of the project, all costs and expenses of the department, including interst due and payable, incurred in performing the duties prescribed in this part shall be paid out of the revenue fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

11821.

The money in the revenue fund is hereby appropriated for the payment of costs and expenses, for the maintenance and operation of the project, for making necessary replacements thereto, and for the payment when due of the principal and interest on all indebtedness incurred under the provisions of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 370.)
-------------------------------------------

11822.

The money remaining in the revenue fund after providing the amount required for interest and redemption of bonds shall be devoted to the payment of the costs of operation and maintenance of the project including necessary replacements thereto to the extent necessary.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 370.)
-------------------------------------------

11823.

Notwithstanding anything contained in this part, the department may provide in the proceedings authorizing the issuance of bonds that revenues received during the period of construction and for a period of one year after completion thereof may be used for the payment during such periods of costs and expenses of the department, including interest due and payable, incurred in performing the duties prescribed in this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 828.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Reserve Funds [11830. - 11832.]

11830.

The proceedings authorizing the issuance of bonds may provide for the setting up of a reserve fund or funds out of the revenues not needed for the payment of operation, maintenance, and replacements, and not needed for the payment of principal and interest as they currently mature, and may provide for the preservation and continuance of such reserve fund or funds in the manner provided in the proceedings.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 370.)
-------------------------------------------

11831.

Any proceedings authorizing the issuance of bonds and providing for the setting up of a reserve fund may also require the immediate application of all surplus money in the revenue fund to the retirement of such bonds prior to maturity, by call or purchase, in such manner and upon such terms and the payment of such premiums as may be deemed advisable in the judgment of the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

11832.

The money remaining in the revenue fund after providing the amount required for interest and redemption of bonds as provided in this article shall be held and applied as provided in the proceedings authorizing the issuance of the bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 370.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Warrants [11835. - 11835.]

11835.

Warrants for payments to be made on account of bonds shall be drawn by the State Controller upon request of the State Treasurer whenever the drawing of warrants is required in order to make the payments.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 370.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Investment and Use of Surplus Money [11840. - 11842.]

11840.

All money in the construction fund not required to meet preconstruction, acquisition, or construction costs and expenses, or interest thereon, of the project, or unit thereof, for which bonds were issued and sold, and all funds constituting surplus revenues which are not immediately needed for the particular object or purpose to which they are required to be applied or are pledged shall be invested in bonds and obligations eligible for investment of surplus State money.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 370.)
-------------------------------------------

11841.

The department may provide in the proceedings authorizing the issuance of bonds that the investment of surplus money shall be made only in particular bonds and obligations within the classifications eligible for such investment and such provisions shall thereupon be binding upon the department and all officials having anything to do with such investment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

11842.

If the proceedings authorizing the issuance of bonds do not require surplus revenues to be held or applied in any particular manner, they shall be allocated and used for such other purposes incidental to the construction, operation, and maintenance of the project and for making necessary replacements thereto as the department may determine.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Insurance and Indemnity Bonds [11850. - 11855.]

11850.

When any of the works authorized by this part are being constructed by the department, the department may carry or cause to be carried such an amount of insurance or indemnity bonds as protection against loss or damage as the department deems proper.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

11851.

The department may carry insurance to cover any accident or destruction in part or in whole to any works until all bonds and interest thereon have been fully redeemed and paid.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

11852.

All money collected on any indemnity bond or insurance policy as the result of any damage or injury to any works shall be used for the purpose of repairing or rebuilding the works, as long as there are bonds outstanding.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 370.)
-------------------------------------------

11853.

The department may carry insurance or indemnity bonds insuring against the loss of revenues to be derived from the project by reason of any interruption in the use of the project, or any part thereof, from any cause whatever, and the proceeds of such insurance or indemnity bonds shall be paid into the fund into which the revenues are required to be paid and shall be applied to the same purposes and in the same manner as other moneys in the fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

11854.

Insurance or indemnity bonds against loss of revenues may be in an amount equal to the probable revenues to be received from the use and operation of the project during any period of time that is determined upon and fixed by the department, and shall be paid for out of the revenue fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

11855.

The department may provide in the proceedings authorizing the issuance of bonds for the carrying of insurance as authorized by this part, and the purchase and carrying of such insurance shall thereupon be obligatory upon the department and be paid for out of the revenue fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 10. Fish and Wildlife and Recreation in Connection With State Water Projects [11900. - 11925.]



  ARTICLE 1. State Policy [11900. - 11901.]

11900.

The Legislature finds and declares it to be necessary for the general public health and welfare that preservation of fish and wildlife be provided for in connection with the construction of state water projects.

The Legislature further finds and declares it to be necessary for the general public health and welfare that facilities for the storage, conservation or regulation of water be constructed in a manner consistent with the full utilization of their potential for the enhancement of fish and wildlife and to meet recreational needs; and further finds and declares that the providing for the enhancement of fish and wildlife and for recreation in connection with water storage, conservation, or regulation facilities benefits all of the people of California and that the project construction costs attributable to such enhancement of fish and wildlife and recreation features should be borne by them.

The Legislature further finds and declares it to be the policy of this State that recreation and the enhancement of fish and wildlife resources are among the purposes of state water projects; that the acquisition of real property for such purposes be planned and initiated concurrently with and as a part of the land acquisition program for other purposes of state water projects; and that facilities for such purposes be ready and available for public use when each state water project having a potential for such uses is completed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 867.)
-------------------------------------------

11901.

It is the purpose of this chapter to provide for the planning and construction of water storage, conservation, and regulation facilities and associated fish and wildlife and recreation features consistent with this declaration and to make provision for funds therefor on a continuing basis, and to provide for the operation and maintenance of such fish and wildlife and recreation features.

In enacting this chapter, however, it is not the intent of the Legislature to diminish any existing powers of the Department of Water Resources, the Department of Parks and Recreation, or the Department of Fish and Game, but rather to provide specifically for the preservation and enhancement of fish and wildlife resources and for a system of public recreation facilities at state water projects as part of a coordinated plan for multipurpose use of these projects.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 93.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Definitions [11903. - 11903.]

11903.

As used in this chapter, “project” means any physical structure to provide for the conservation, storage, regulation, transportation, or use of water, constructed by the State itself or by the State in co-operation with the United States.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 867.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Application [11905. - 11905.]

11905.

The provision of this chapter shall apply to the Central Valley Project and every other project constructed by the State itself or by the State in co-operation with the United States, including, but not limited to, the State Water Resources Development System.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 867.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Planning and Construction of Projects [11910. - 11915.5.]

11910.

There shall be incorporated in the planning and construction of each project those features (including, but not limited to, additional storage capacity) that the department, after giving full consideration to any recommendations which may be made by the Department of Fish and Game, the Department of Parks and Recreation, any federal agency, and any local governmental agency with jurisdiction over the area involved, determines necessary or desirable for the preservation of fish and wildlife, and necessary or desirable to permit, on a year-round basis, full utilization of the project for the enhancement of fish and wildlife and for recreational purposes to the extent that those features are consistent with other uses of
 the project, if any. It is the intent of the Legislature that there shall be full and close
 coordination of all planning for the preservation and enhancement of fish and wildlife and for recreation in connection with state water projects by and between the Department of Water Resources, the Department of Parks and Recreation, the Department of Fish and Wildlife, and all appropriate federal and local agencies.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 352, Sec. 529.   (AB 1317)   Effective September 26, 2013.   Operative July 1, 2013, by Sec. 543 of Ch. 352.)
-------------------------------------------

11910.1.

In furtherance of the policies specified in Section 11910, the Department of Fish and Wildlife, the Department of Parks and Recreation, and other governmental agencies shall submit their recommendations or comments on reconnaissance studies or feasibility reports of the Department of Water Resources relating to any project or feature of a project within 60 days following receipt of a formal request for review from the Department of Water Resources.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 352, Sec. 530.   (AB 1317)   Effective September 26, 2013.   Operative July 1, 2013, by Sec. 543 of Ch. 352.)
-------------------------------------------

11910.5.

Such recreational purposes include, but are not limited to, those recreational pursuits generally associated with the out-of-doors, such as camping, picnicking, fishing, hunting, water contact sports, boating, and sightseeing, and the associated facilities of campgrounds, picnic areas, water and sanitary facilities, parking areas, view points, boat launching ramps, and any others necessary to make project land and water areas available for use by the public.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 867.)
-------------------------------------------

11911.
